Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-681
Railroad companies; annual statement.

The president or other chief officer of every railroad company which has lines running through, in, or into this state shall, on or before June 1 of each year, furnish to the Property Tax Administrator a statement, verified by the affidavit of the officer or person making the statement, showing the total number of miles traveled by each class of cars of every car line company on their lines, branches, sidings, spurs, and warehouse tracks in this state during the preceding year ending December 31. For good cause shown, the Property Tax Administrator may allow an extension of time in which to file such statement. Such extension shall not exceed thirty days after June 1.

Laws 1992, LB 1063, § 66;

Laws 1992, LB 719A, § 207;

Laws 1993, LB 734, § 48;

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 76;

Laws 1997, LB 270, § 33.